Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
CONSOLIDATION AND ANNEXATION -
STATUTORY CITIES AND TOWNS

31-12-401. Consolidation of contiguous cities or towns.

When two or more contiguous cities or towns desire to consolidate with each other, the governing body of each such city or town shall appoint from the officers or citizens thereof a total of three commissioners. The commissioners shall confer together and thereafter report to each governing body the terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation. Such report shall contain, in addition to any other matters which the commissioners may desire to insert therein, the following:

The name for the proposed consolidated city or town;

The number of wards into which the new city shall be divided, in the case of a proposed consolidated city, together with the boundaries of such wards.

In fixing the number of wards, the commissioners shall not select a number which exceeds the entire number of wards contained in all of the cities and towns proposed to be consolidated; except that one ward may be allowed for each town proposed to be consolidated with a city.

If the governing body of each such city or town approves the terms and conditions contained in the report, it shall so declare by proper ordinance which may be passed at any one regular or special meeting called for the purpose. Thereupon the governing body of each such city or town shall submit, by ordinance, the question of consolidation upon the terms and conditions so proposed to the registered electors of its respective city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1096, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-301 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-402. Election - notice - ballot.

In case the ordinance of approval is passed by the governing body less than one hundred twenty days and more than thirty days prior to the regular election in such city or town, the submission to the electors shall be at such regular election; otherwise, the governing body, in the ordinance of approval, shall order a special election, to be held not less than thirty days nor more than forty days after that date for the purpose of determining the question of such consolidation. Such election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

The mayor or, in case there is no mayor, the presiding officer of the governing body shall cause notice of the election to be given, which notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

The form of the ballots or voting machine tabs at such election shall be: "For Consolidation" and "Against Consolidation". If a majority of the votes cast at such election in each of the cities or towns proposed to be consolidated are for consolidation, the proposition shall be carried. If a majority of the votes cast at such election in any of the cities or towns proposed to be consolidated are against consolidation, the proposition shall be defeated, and such question shall not be submitted again for one year.

If any one or more of the cities or towns proposed to be consolidated was a city, the consolidated corporation shall be a city.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1096, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-12-403. Election of officers after consolidation.

In case the proposition for consolidation is carried in all of said cities or towns, the mayors or presiding officers of the governing bodies shall at once issue a joint proclamation announcing an election of officers of the consolidated city or town. Notice of the election shall be given in the manner prescribed by the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". At said election there shall be chosen a board of trustees if the consolidated corporation is a town, and, if it is a city, there shall be chosen a mayor and two councilmen for each ward of the consolidated city. There shall be elected, in addition, such other officers as under the law are or may be elected by the electors in cities or towns. Such election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965" insofar as practicable under the direction of the clerks and governing bodies of the cities and towns which were consolidated.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1097, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-12-404. Tenure of officers.

All officers chosen at such election, including councilmen, shall hold their respective offices until the next regular election. At the first regular election succeeding the consolidation and at each succeeding regular election thereafter, there shall be elected two councilmen for each ward of said city, each of whom shall hold office for a term of two years.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1097, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-304 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-405. Consolidation complete.

The members of the governing body elected at such election, on the second Monday after the election, shall meet and organize the governing body of the consolidated city or town and shall file two certified copies of the notice of the consolidation with a legal description accompanied by a map of the area concerned by the consolidated city or town with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such action has taken place, and from that time the consolidation shall be deemed complete. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy of such notice with the division of local government in the department of local affairs, as provided by section 24-32-109, C.R.S. The consolidated city or town shall thenceforth exist with the same powers and duties and subject to the same regulations as other cities or towns. The cities or towns so consolidated shall then be merged in the consolidated corporation, and the terms of office of all of the officers of the cities and towns so consolidated shall cease.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1097, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-306 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-406. First ordinances - appropriation.

The governing body of the consolidated city or town may pass, at the first meeting or as soon thereafter as possible, a resolution adopting in a body the ordinances of some one of the cities or towns forming the consolidated town or city as such ordinances existed at the date of consolidation. Upon the passage of the resolution, the whole of the ordinances of the city or town so designated as they existed at the date of consolidation shall become the ordinances of the consolidated city or town in the same manner as if they had been regularly passed and published by the governing body of the consolidated city or town and shall so remain until amended or repealed. They shall also make appropriation, by ordinance, for the expense of the then unexpired portion of the current fiscal or municipal year.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-307 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-407. Licenses.

All licenses or other privileges issued or granted by any of the consolidated towns or cities prior to consolidation shall remain in full force and effect until the expiration of the same according to the terms thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-308 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-408. Bonded and floating indebtedness.

All bonded indebtedness due or owing by any city or town prior to consolidation shall remain, after consolidation, the debt of that portion of the consolidated city or town comprised within the former limits of the city or town which owed such indebtedness prior to consolidation. No tax shall be levied or collected for the payment of the principal and interest of such indebtedness, except upon and from persons or property residing or situated within the former limits of the town or city owing such indebtedness. The governing body of the consolidated city or town shall make such levies and take such other measures for the payment of the principal and interest out of the property within such limits as it would have been the duty or within the power of the governing body of the city or town owing such indebtedness to do had no such consolidation taken place. If any of the cities or towns consolidated owed any floating indebtedness at the date of consolidation, the governing body of the consolidated city or town shall ascertain the amount of such indebtedness owed by each of said cities or towns prior to consolidation and, at the next annual levy of taxes succeeding consolidation, shall make a special levy upon property situated within the former limits of the city or town owing such indebtedness sufficient for the payment of the same. The terms of consolidation may make other provisions for said bonded or floating indebtedness. Any such bonded indebtedness may be refunded by the consolidated city or town under the provisions of the laws of Colorado existing at the time of such refunding providing for the refunding of bonds of cities and towns.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-309 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-409. Property belongs to consolidated cities or towns.

All property, real or personal, belonging to any of the cities or towns prior to consolidation, unless the agreement for consolidation otherwise provides, immediately upon the accomplishment of consolidation, shall vest in and become the property of the consolidated city or town. All indebtedness, claims, demands, or rights owing or belonging to any of said cities or towns prior to consolidation in like manner shall vest in and become due to the consolidated city or town, which shall thereafter have the right to demand, have, sue for, recover, and enforce the same in its own name.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-310 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-410. Suits - special tax.

If any actions, suits, or proceedings are pending against any one of the cities or towns at the time of the consolidation, the consolidated city or town shall be substituted as plaintiff or defendant in such action, suit, or proceeding. The same shall thenceforth proceed as if the claim, right, debt, or demand upon which said action, suit, or proceeding was founded had originally existed in favor of or against such consolidated town or city. In like manner, any person who, at the date of consolidation, has any claim, demand, or right of action against any one or more of the cities or towns so consolidating may bring any action, suit, or proceeding necessary for the collection or enforcement thereof after such consolidation against the consolidated city or town in the same manner as though the claim, demand, or right of action had originally existed against such consolidated city or town. In no case shall any tax be levied upon or liability incurred by any property or persons on account of such actions, suits, proceedings, debts, liabilities, or rights of action, except those persons and property which would have been liable for the same in case no consolidation had taken place. The governing body of the consolidated city or town has the power to levy a special tax upon persons and property within the former limits of the city or town against which such action, suit, proceeding, claim, demand, or right of action existed for the payment, liquidation, or settlement thereof or of any judgment founded thereon. The terms of consolidation may make other provisions for the payment of such demands, liabilities, and judgments.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1099, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-311 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-411. Collection of prior taxes - disposition.

The county treasurer shall proceed to collect all taxes assessed against persons or property within the limits of the cities or towns consolidating prior to such consolidation in the same manner as if no such consolidation had taken place. All moneys in the hands of the county treasurer at the date of consolidation belonging to any of the consolidating cities or towns and all moneys thereafter collected by him on account of any of such consolidating cities or towns shall be turned over by him to the proper officers of the consolidated city or town. In the same manner, if there are, at the date of consolidation, any moneys in the hands of any officer of any of the consolidating cities or towns belonging to his city or town, he shall forthwith turn over such moneys, upon the accomplishment of consolidation, to the proper officers of the consolidated city or town. The moneys thus obtained shall be applied to the payment of the indebtedness of the city or town from which they were derived, and the balance, if any, shall be used for the purpose of the consolidated city or town, unless the terms of consolidation otherwise provide.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1099, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-312 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-412. Annexing cities and towns.

When any city or town desires to be annexed to another contiguous city or town, the governing body of each such city or town shall appoint a total of three commissioners to arrange and report to such governing body respectively the terms and conditions on which the proposed annexation can be made. If the governing body of each such city or town approves of the terms and conditions proposed, it shall so declare by proper ordinance. Thereupon, the governing body of each such city or town, by ordinance passed at least thirty days prior to the regular election therein or at least thirty days prior to a special election for that specific purpose, may submit the question of such annexation upon the terms and conditions so proposed to the registered electors of its respective city or town. Such election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

If a majority of the registered electors of each city or town vote in favor of such annexation, the governing body of each shall so declare by proper ordinance. A certified copy of the whole proceedings for annexation of the city or town to be annexed shall be filed with the clerk of the city or town to which the annexation is made, and the latter shall file two certified copies of the notice of such action with a legal description accompanied by a map of the area concerned with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such action has taken place. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy of such notice with the division of local government in the department of local affairs, as provided by section 24-32-109, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1099, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-313 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965, see article 10 of this title.

31-12-413. Annexation complete - rights - liabilities.

When certified copies of the proceedings for annexation are filed as contemplated in section 31-12-412, the annexation shall be complete, and the city or town to which the annexation is made has the power to pass such ordinances, not inconsistent with law, as will carry into effect the terms of such annexation. Thereafter, the city or town annexed shall be governed as part of the city or town to which it is annexed. Such annexation shall not affect or impair any rights or liabilities then existing for or against either of such cities or towns, and they may be enforced the same as if no such annexation had taken place.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1100, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-314 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-414. School districts - annexation of area to another school district - applicability.

When any consolidation under this part 4 will result in the detachment of an area from any school district and the attachment of such area to another district, the provisions of section 31-12-304 shall apply with respect to the approval of the board of directors of the school district to which such area will be attached and with respect to the compensation required to be paid by the school district which acquires school facilities located within the detached area.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any consolidation proceedings which have not been completed prior to May 22, 1971.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1100, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-315 as it existed prior to 1975.